Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1142.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2706 of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2706. Resident license and fee exemptions.* * *(i) Complimentary antlerless deer license.--(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, an individual who successfully completes a hunter education program provided by the commission under section 2704(b) shall be eligible to receive one antlerless deer license from the commission.(2) An antlerless deer license issued under this subsection shall be valid only for the license year in which the hunter education program was completed or the immediately 123456789101112131415161718 subsequent license year.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1142PN1393 - 2 - 12